lexc-files/inflections/noun/noun-infl_strongGH.txt
^[All.1DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtegnun   PostInflV; ^[All.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtegnun   PostInflV; ^[All.1DuPoss.Du]:^egemtegnun PostInflV;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
^[All.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpenun    PostInflV; ^[All.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpenun    PostInflV; ^[All.2SgPoss.Du]:^egpenun    PostInflV;
^[All.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpegnun   PostInflV; ^[All.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpegnun   PostInflV; ^[All.2SgPoss.Du]:^egpegnun   PostInflV;
^[All.2PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpesinun  PostInflV; ^[All.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpesinun  PostInflV; ^[All.2PlPoss.Du]:^egpesinun  PostInflV;
^[All.2DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetegnun PostInflV; ^[All.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetegnun PostInflV; ^[All.2DuPoss.Du]:^egpetegnun PostInflV;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
^[All.3SgPoss.Sg]:^anun             PostInflV; ^[All.3SgPoss.Pl]:^anun             PostInflV; ^[All.3SgPoss.Du]:^egkenun    PostInflV;
^[All.3PlPoss.Sg]:^itnun            PostInflV; ^[All.3PlPoss.Pl]:^itnun            PostInflV; ^[All.3PlPoss.Du]:^itnun      PostInflV;
^[All.3DuPoss.Sg]:^egkenun          PostInflV; ^[All.3DuPoss.Pl]:^itnun            PostInflV; ^[All.3DuPoss.Du]:^itnun      PostInflV;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
^[All.4SgPoss.Sg]:^minun            PostInflV; ^[All.4SgPoss.Pl]:^minun            PostInflV; ^[All.4SgPoss.Du]:^egminun    PostInflV;
^[All.4PlPoss.Sg]:^meggnun          PostInflV; ^[All.4PlPoss.Pl]:^meggnun          PostInflV; ^[All.4PlPoss.Du]:^egmeggnun  PostInflV;
^[All.4DuPoss.Sg]:^megnun           PostInflV; ^[All.4DuPoss.Pl]:^megnun           PostInflV; ^[All.4DuPoss.Du]:^egmegnun   PostInflV;
^[All.4DuPoss.Sg]:^megtenun         PostInflV; ^[All.4DuPoss.Pl]:^megtenun         PostInflV; ^[All.4DuPoss.Du]:^egmegtenun PostInflV;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|

!----------------------------------------------|
!             PERLATIVE (vialis)               |
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.Sg]:^kun                        PostInflV; ^[Prl.Pl]:^etgun                      PostInflV; ^[Prl.Du]:^egnekun               PostInflV;
                                                 ^[Prl.Pl]:^teggun                     PostInflV;                                           |
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mkun        PostInflV; ^[Prl.1SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mkun        PostInflV; ^[Prl.1SgPoss.Du]:^egemkun       PostInflV;
^[Prl.1PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mteggun     PostInflV; ^[Prl.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mteggun     PostInflV; ^[Prl.1PlPoss.Du]:^egemteggun    PostInflV;
^[Prl.1DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtegnegun   PostInflV; ^[Prl.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtegnegun   PostInflV; ^[Prl.1DuPoss.Du]:^egemtegnegun  PostInflV;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpegun      PostInflV; ^[Prl.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpegun      PostInflV; ^[Prl.2SgPoss.Du]:^egpegun       PostInflV;
^[Prl.2PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpesigun    PostInflV; ^[Prl.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpesigun    PostInflV; ^[Prl.2PlPoss.Du]:^egpesigun     PostInflV;
^[Prl.2DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetegnegun PostInflV; ^[Prl.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetegnegun PostInflV; ^[Prl.2DuPoss.Du]:^egpetegnegun  PostInflV;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.3SgPoss.Sg]:^akun               PostInflV; ^[Prl.3SgPoss.Pl]:^akun               PostInflV; ^[Prl.3SgPoss.Du]:^egkenkun      PostInflV;
^[Prl.3PlPoss.Sg]:^itgun              PostInflV; ^[Prl.3PlPoss.Pl]:^itgun              PostInflV; ^[Prl.3PlPoss.Du]:^itgun         PostInflV;
^[Prl.3DuPoss.Sg]:^egkenkun           PostInflV; ^[Prl.3DuPoss.Pl]:^akun               PostInflV; ^[Prl.3PlPoss.Du]:^itgun         PostInflV;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.4SgPoss.Sg]:^mikun              PostInflV; ^[Prl.4SgPoss.Pl]:^mikun              PostInflV; ^[Prl.4SgPoss.Du]:^egmikun       PostInflV;
^[Prl.4PlPoss.Sg]:^megteggun          PostInflV; ^[Prl.4PlPoss.Pl]:^megteggun          PostInflV; ^[Prl.4PlPoss.Du]:^egmegteggun   PostInflV;
^[Prl.4DuPoss.Sg]:^megtegnegun        PostInflV; ^[Prl.4DuPoss.Pl]:^megtegnegun        PostInflV; ^[Prl.4DuPoss.Du]:^egmegtegnegun PostInflV;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|

!---------------------------------------------|
!             EQUATIVE (equalis)              |
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.Sg]:^tun                       PostInflV; ^[Equ.Pl]:^estun                     PostInflV; ^[Equ.Du]:^egestun              PostInflV;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtun       PostInflV; ^[Equ.1SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtun       PostInflV; ^[Equ.1SgPoss.Du]:^egemtun      PostInflV;
^[Equ.1PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtestun    PostInflV; ^[Equ.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtestun    PostInflV; ^[Equ.1PlPoss.Du]:^egemtestun   PostInflV;
^[Equ.1DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtegestun  PostInflV; ^[Equ.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtegestun  PostInflV; ^[Equ.1DuPoss.Du]:^egemtegestun PostInflV;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetun     PostInflV; ^[Equ.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetun     PostInflV; ^[Equ.2SgPoss.Du]:^egpetun      PostInflV;
^[Equ.2PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpesistun  PostInflV; ^[Equ.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpesistun  PostInflV; ^[Equ.2PlPoss.Du]:^egpesistun   PostInflV;
^[Equ.2DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetegetun PostInflV; ^[Equ.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetegetun PostInflV; ^[Equ.2DuPoss.Du]:^egpetegetun  PostInflV;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.3SgPoss.Sg]:^atun              PostInflV; ^[Equ.Sg.3SgPoss]:^atun              PostInflV; ^[Equ.3SgPoss.Du]:^egketun      PostInflV;
^[Equ.3PlPoss.Sg]:^itun              PostInflV; ^[Equ.Sg.3PlPoss]:^itun              PostInflV; ^[Equ.3PlPoss.Du]:^itun         PostInflV;
^[Equ.3DuPoss.Sg]:^egketun           PostInflV; ^[Equ.3DuPoss.Pl]:^itun              PostInflV; ^[Equ.3PlPoss.Du]:^itun         PostInflV;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.4SgPoss.Sg]:^mitun             PostInflV; ^[Equ.4SgPoss.Pl]:^mitun             PostInflV; ^[Equ.4SgPoss.Du]:^egmitun      PostInflV;
^[Equ.4PlPoss.Sg]:^megestun          PostInflV; ^[Equ.4PlPoss.Pl]:^megestun          PostInflV; ^[Equ.4PlPoss.Du]:^egmegestun   PostInflV;
^[Equ.4DuPoss.Sg]:^megestun          PostInflV; ^[Equ.4DuPoss.Pl]:^megestun          PostInflV; ^[Equ.4DuPoss.Du]:^egmegestun   PostInflV;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------|

!--------------------------------------------|
! Obsolete Verb Root -ete                    |
!   ^[Jacobson (2001) p.78]                  |
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
^[Loc.Sg]:^m                      VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.Pl]:^n                      VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.Du]:^egn              VerbRootEte;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
^[Loc.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mn      VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mn      VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1SgPoss.Du]:^egemn    VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.1PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mnn     VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mnn     VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1PlPoss.Du]:^egemnn   VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.1DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtegn   VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtegn   VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1DuPoss.Du]:^egemtegn VerbRootEte;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
^[Loc.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpen    VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpen    VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Du]:^egpen    VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpegn   VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpegn   VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Du]:^egpegn   VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.2PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpesin  VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpesin  VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2PlPoss.Du]:^egpesin  VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.2DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetegn VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetegn VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2DuPoss.Du]:^egpetegn VerbRootEte;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
^[Loc.3SgPoss.Sg]:^an             VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3SgPoss.Pl]:^an             VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3SgPoss.Du]:^egken    VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.3PlPoss.Sg]:^itn            VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Pl]:^itn            VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Du]:^itn      VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.3DuPoss.Sg]:^egken          VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Pl]:^itn            VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Du]:^itn      VerbRootEte;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
^[Loc.4SgPoss.Sg]:^min            VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4SgPoss.Pl]:^min            VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4SgPoss.Du]:^egmin    VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.4PlPoss.Sg]:^meggn          VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4PlPoss.Pl]:^meggn          VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4PlPoss.Du]:^egmeggn  VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.4DuPoss.Sg]:^megten         VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Pl]:^megten         VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Du]:^egmegten VerbRootEte;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
